Maryland, session 2025, SB0466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–204.
(a) In addition to any other of its powers and duties, the Division has the powers
and duties to:
(15) (i) Bring a civil action for damages or an action under this title
against a person who violates § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article on behalf
of a victim of the offense or, if the victim is deceased, the victim’s estate;
(ii) Recover damages under this item for property loss or damage;
and
(iii) If the Division prevails in an action brought under this item,
recover the costs of the action for the use of the Office of the Attorney General; and
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xxiv) Section 7–304, § 7–104.1, or § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
14–4303.
(a) The purpose of the Unit is to protect seniors and vulnerable adults from
financial crimes under § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article.
(b) The Unit may bring a civil action under § 13–204(a)(15) of this article or §
11–209(a) of the Corporations and Associations Article for damages against a person who
violates § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article.

SENATE BILL 466
(c) A conviction for an offense under § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law
Article is not a prerequisite for maintenance of an action under subsection (b) of this section.
Article – Corporations and Associations
11–209.
(a) The Commissioner may:
(1) (i) Bring a civil action for damages against a person that violates §
7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article on behalf of a victim of the violation or, if
the victim is deceased, the victim’s estate;
(ii) Recover damages under this subsection for property loss or
damage; and
(iii) If the Commissioner prevails in an action brought under this
paragraph, recover the costs of the action for the use of the Office of the Attorney General;
and
(2) (i) Bring a civil action for damages on behalf of a susceptible adult
or older adult who is authorized to bring a cause of action under § 13–603 of the Estates
and Trusts Article; and
(ii) If the Commissioner prevails in an action brought under this
paragraph, recover the costs of the action for the use of the Office of the Attorney General.
(b) A conviction for a violation of § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law
Article is not a prerequisite for maintenance of an action under subsection (a) of this section.
Article – Correctional Services
7–301.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Eligible incarcerated individual” means an incarcerated individual
who:
(ii) is serving a sentence for which the most serious offense is:
2. a violation involving a value of $1,500 or less of § 7–104, §
7–104.1, § 8–103, § 8–206, § 8–207, § 8–209, § 8–301, § 8–509, § 8–510, § 8–511, § 8–512,
§ 8–513, § 8–514, § 8–515, § 8–611, or § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings

SENATE BILL 466 5
4–301.
(b) Except as provided in § 4–302 of this subtitle, the District Court also has
exclusive original jurisdiction in a criminal case in which a person at least 18 years old or
a corporation is charged with:
(18) Violation of § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
Article – Criminal Law
7–104.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CAREGIVER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) “FAMILY MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(4) “HOUSEHOLD MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(5) “VULNERABLE ADULT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(B) A CAREGIVER, FAMILY MEMBER, OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER OF AN
INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY OBTAIN THE PROPERTY OF THE
INDIVIDUAL WITH INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE INDIVIDUAL OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PROPERTY IF THE CAREGIVER, FAMILY MEMBER, OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER KNOWS
OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW THAT:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VULNERABLE ADULT; OR
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL IS AT LEAST 68 YEARS.
(C) (1) (I) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
WHEN THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS AT LEAST $1,500 BUT LESS THAN $25,000 IS
GUILTY OF A FELONY AND:
1. IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5
YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH; AND

SENATE BILL 466
2. SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN OR ITS VALUE
TO THE OWNER OR, IF THE OWNER IS DECEASED, RESTORE THE PROPERTY OR ITS
VALUE TO THE OWNER’S ESTATE.
(II) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
WHEN THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS AT LEAST $25,000 BUT LESS THAN $100,000
IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND:
1. IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10
YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $15,000 OR BOTH; AND
2. SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN OR ITS VALUE
TO THE OWNER OR, IF THE OWNER IS DECEASED, RESTORE THE PROPERTY OR ITS
VALUE TO THE OWNER’S ESTATE.
(III) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
WHEN THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS $100,000 OR MORE IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
AND:
1. IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 20
YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 OR BOTH; AND
2. SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN OR ITS VALUE
TO THE OWNER OR, IF THE OWNER IS DECEASED, RESTORE THE PROPERTY OR ITS
VALUE TO THE OWNER’S ESTATE.
(2) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION WHEN
THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS LESS THAN $1,500 IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND:
(I) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH; AND
(II) SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN OR ITS VALUE TO
THE OWNER OR, IF THE OWNER IS DECEASED, RESTORE THE PROPERTY OR ITS
VALUE TO THE OWNER’S ESTATE.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE SEPARATE FROM
AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR ANY CRIME BASED
ON THE ACT OR ACTS ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) IF A DEFENDANT FAILS TO RESTORE FULLY THE PROPERTY
TAKEN OR ITS VALUE AS ORDERED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEFENDANT IS DISQUALIFIED, TO THE EXTENT OF THE DEFENDANT’S FAILURE TO

SENATE BILL 466 7
RESTORE THE PROPERTY OR ITS VALUE, FROM INHERITING, TAKING, ENJOYING,
RECEIVING, OR OTHERWISE BENEFITING FROM THE ESTATE, INSURANCE
PROCEEDS, OR PROPERTY OF THE VICTIM OF THE OFFENSE, WHETHER BY
OPERATION OF LAW OR PURSUANT TO A LEGAL DOCUMENT EXECUTED OR ENTERED
INTO BY THE VICTIM BEFORE THE DEFENDANT HAS BEEN CONVICTED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE DEFENDANT HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF WITH RESPECT TO
ESTABLISHING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT THE DEFENDANT
HAS FULLY RESTORED THE PROPERTY TAKEN OR ITS VALUE.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE CRIMINAL
LIABILITY ON A PERSON WHO, AT THE REQUEST OF THE VICTIM OF THE OFFENSE,
THE VICTIM’S FAMILY, OR THE COURT–APPOINTED GUARDIAN OF THE VICTIM, HAS
MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO ASSIST THE VICTIM IN THE MANAGEMENT OF OR
TRANSFER OF THE VICTIM’S PROPERTY.
(G) IN ADDITION TO ANY PENALTIES SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION, A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION:
(1) IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) IS SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
7–108.
(a) An indictment, information, warrant, or other charging document for theft
under this part, other than for taking a motor vehicle under § 7–105 of this part, is sufficient
if it substantially states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) stole (property or services stolen) of (name
of victim), having a value of (less than $1,500, at least $1,500 but less than $25,000, at least
$25,000 but less than $100,000, or $100,000 or more) in violation of § 7–104 OR § 7–104.1
of the Criminal Law Article, against the peace, government, and dignity of the State.”.
(b) An indictment, information, warrant, or other charging document for theft
under this part for taking a motor vehicle under § 7–105 of this part is sufficient if it
substantially states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) knowingly and willfully took a motor
vehicle out of (name of victim)’s lawful custody, control, or use, without the consent of (name
of victim), in violation of § 7–105 of the Criminal Law Article, against the peace,
government, and dignity of the State.”.

SENATE BILL 466
(c) In a case in the circuit court in which the general form of indictment or
information is used to charge a defendant with a crime under this part, the defendant, on
timely demand, is entitled to a bill of particulars.
(d) Unless specifically charged by the State, theft of property or services with a
value of less than $100 as provided under § 7–104(g)(3) of this subtitle may not be
considered a lesser included crime of any other crime.
Article – Criminal Procedure
4–206.
(b) A State’s Attorney may file a petition to freeze assets of a defendant charged
with violating § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article with the circuit court of
the county in which the defendant was charged if:
(1) the petition is filed within 60 days of the defendant being charged with
a violation of § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
(2) the alleged value of lost or stolen property in the criminal charge giving
rise to the petition is $10,000 or more;
(3) the amount of money subject to the petition does not exceed the alleged
value of lost or stolen property in the criminal charge giving rise to the petition; and
(4) the State’s Attorney sends a notice of intent to file a petition to each
financial institution in possession of money subject to the petition.
(d) A court may grant a petition to freeze assets and issue an order to freeze assets
if the State’s Attorney proves by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) the defendant has a legal, equitable, or possessory interest in the money
listed in the petition; and
(2) the money listed in the petition is not jointly held unless the State’s
Attorney also proves by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(i) the defendant transferred the defendant’s money to avoid being
subject to an order to freeze assets; or
(ii) the money listed in the petition was used in connection with a
violation of § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article.
Article – Estates and Trusts
11–111.

SENATE BILL 466 9
(a) A person convicted of unlawfully obtaining property from a victim in violation
of § 7–104.1(B) OR § 8–801(b) of the Criminal Law Article shall be disqualified from
inheriting, taking, enjoying, receiving, or otherwise benefitting from the estate, insurance
proceeds, or property of the victim, to the extent provided in § 7–104.1(E) OR § 8–801(e) of
the Criminal Law Article.
(d) A fiduciary or other person who distributes property in good faith and without
actual knowledge of a conviction under § 7–104.1 OR § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article
is not personally liable for the distribution.
Article – Criminal Law
8–801.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CAREGIVER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
[(2)] (3) “Deception” has the meaning stated in § 7–101 of this article.
[(3)] (4) “Deprive” has the meaning stated in § 7–101 of this article.
(5) “FAMILY MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(6) “HOUSEHOLD MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–604 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
[(4)] (7) “Obtain” has the meaning stated in § 7–101 of this article.
[(5)] (8) “Property” has the meaning stated in § 7–101 of this article.
[(6)] (9) (i) “Undue influence” means domination and influence
amounting to force and coercion exercised by another person to such an extent that a
vulnerable adult or an individual at least 68 years old was prevented from exercising free
judgment and choice.
(ii) “Undue influence” does not include the normal influence that one
member of a family has over another member of the family.
[(7)] (10) “Value” has the meaning stated in § 7–103 of this article.
[(8)] (11) “Vulnerable adult” has the meaning stated in § 3–604 of this
article.

SENATE BILL 466
(b) (1) A person may not knowingly and willfully obtain by deception,
intimidation, or undue influence the property of an individual that the person knows or
reasonably should know is a vulnerable adult with intent to deprive the vulnerable adult
of the vulnerable adult’s property.
(2) A person may not knowingly and willfully obtain by deception,
intimidation, or undue influence the property of an individual that the person knows or
reasonably should know is at least 68 years old, with intent to deprive the individual of the
individual’s property.
(3) A PERSON WHO IS A CAREGIVER TO OR A FAMILY MEMBER OR
HOUSEHOLD MEMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY
EXERT UNAUTHORIZED CONTROL OVER AND OBTAIN THE PROPERTY OF THE
INDIVIDUAL WITH INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE INDIVIDUAL OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PROPERTY IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VULNERABLE ADULT; AND
(II) THE PERSON KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW THAT
THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VULNERABLE ADULT.
(c) (1) (i) A person convicted of a violation of this section when the value of
the property is at least $1,500 but less than $25,000 is guilty of a felony and:
1. is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine
not exceeding $10,000 or both; and
2. shall restore the property taken or its value to the owner,
or, if the owner is deceased, restore the property or its value to the owner’s estate.
(ii) A person convicted of a violation of this section when the value of
the property is at least $25,000 but less than $100,000 is guilty of a felony and:
1. is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine
not exceeding $15,000 or both; and
2. shall restore the property taken or its value to the owner,
or, if the owner is deceased, restore the property or its value to the owner’s estate.
(iii) A person convicted of a violation of this section when the value of
the property is $100,000 or more is guilty of a felony and:
1. is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 20 years or a fine
not exceeding $25,000 or both; and

SENATE BILL 466 11
2. shall restore the property taken or its value to the owner,
or, if the owner is deceased, restore the property or its value to the owner’s estate.
(2) A person convicted of a violation of this section when the value of the
property is less than $1,500 is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(i) is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not
exceeding $500 or both; and
(ii) shall restore the property taken or its value to the owner, or, if
the owner is deceased, restore the property or its value to the owner’s estate.
(d) (1) A sentence imposed FOR A CONVICTION under SUBSECTION (B)(1)
OR (2) OF this section may be separate from and consecutive to or concurrent with a
sentence for any crime based on the act or acts establishing the violation of this section.
(2) A SENTENCE IMPOSED FOR A CONVICTION UNDER SUBSECTION
(B)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONCURRENT WITH AND NOT CONSECUTIVE TO A
SENTENCE FOR ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT OR ACTS ESTABLISHING THE
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(e) (1) If a defendant fails to restore fully the property taken or its value as
ordered under subsection (c) of this section, the defendant is disqualified, to the extent of
the defendant’s failure to restore the property or its value, from inheriting, taking, enjoying,
receiving, or otherwise benefiting from the estate, insurance proceeds, or property of the
victim of the offense, whether by operation of law or pursuant to a legal document executed
or entered into by the victim before the defendant shall have been convicted under this
section.
(2) The defendant has the burden of proof with respect to establishing
under paragraph (1) of this subsection that the defendant has fully restored the property
taken or its value.
(f) This section may not be construed to impose criminal liability on a person who,
at the request of the victim of the offense, the victim’s family, or the court appointed
guardian of the victim, has made a good faith effort to assist the victim in the management
of or transfer of the victim’s property.
(g) In addition to any penalties set forth in this section, a violation of this section:
(1) is an unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practice within the meaning of
Title 13 of the Commercial Law Article; and
(2) is subject to the enforcement and penalty provisions contained in Title
13 of the Commercial Law Article.

SENATE BILL 466
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.